District of Columbia statutes.
44-951.07

Transfer of assets under Deed of Trust.

Upon foreclosure under the Deed of Trust, Security Agreement, Fixture Filing and Restrictive Covenants signed by CMC Realty, LLC and Capital Medical Center, LLC on November 7, 2007, or upon any other transfer of assets, the Mayor is authorized to transfer all of the assets, including cash, accounts receivable, and real and personal property, of United Medical Center to the Corporation.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 5118, 58 DCR 6226